Idaho, session 2026, S1347.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Section 67-6223, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
67-6223. BORROWING POWER -- FINANCIAL ASSISTANCE -- COOPERATION WITH
STATE AND FEDERAL GOVERNMENT. (1) In addition to the powers conferred upon
the association by other provisions of this chapter, the association is em-
powered to administer any other state, private or federal assistance program
including without limitation all tax credit programs, guaranty, loan or in-
vestment funds and block grants and to borrow money or accept contributions,
grants or other financial assistance or investment from private sources or
from the state or federal government for or in aid of any housing project,
nonprofit facility, economic development project or agricultural facility
within its area of operation, to take over or lease or manage any housing
project, nonprofit facility, economic development project or agricultural
facility or undertaking constructed or owned by the federal government, and
to these ends, to comply with such conditions and to make such trust inden-
tures, leases or agreements as may be necessary, convenient or desirable.
It is the purpose and intent of this act to authorize the association to do
any and all things necessary or desirable to secure the financial aid or co-
operation of the state or federal government in the undertaking, construc-
tion, maintenance or operation of any housing project, nonprofit facility,
economic development project or agricultural facility by the association.
The association is specifically authorized to work with the Idaho department
of agriculture in connection with any loan for an agricultural facility and
the Idaho department of agriculture shall assist in the provisions of such
loans.
(2) On or after July 1, 2026, the association shall report on any fed-
eral funds received through the continuum of care (COC) program and the emer-
gency solutions grant program provided in 24 CFR 578 and 24 CFR 576, respec-
tively, and shall report outlays and outcomes of spending of all recipient
and subrecipient awards, except when data is not reportable from victim ser-
vice providers, as follows:
(a) For each recipient awarded program funding, the report shall in-
clude the following information:
(i) The organization's name and address;
(ii) The total award amount;


(iii) The total ending balance of unspent funds upon the expira-
tion of the grant period;
(iv) The recipient's total grant expenses by component, including
by type of supportive service within the supportive services com-
ponent for the COC program for projects and activities related to
homelessness assistance; and
(v) A narrative describing the purpose, objectives, and goals of
each program;
(b) For each subrecipient receiving a subaward under the program, in-
cluding the recipient in any case where the recipient administers a
project directly, the report shall include the following information:
(i) The organization's name and address;
(ii) The total subaward by project, including required match;
(iii) The total ending balance of unspent funds upon the expira-
tion of the grant period; and
(iv) The subrecipient's total project expenses by component, in-
cluding by type of supportive service within the supportive ser-
vices component for the COC program;
(c) For each recipient and subrecipient, the report shall include, at a
project level, the following information about outcomes:
(i) The number of individuals and households served by component
types carried out under the project;
(ii) The start date and end date of project participation by in-
dividual or household, excluding personally identifying informa-
tion;
(iii) The supportive services provided to each de-identified
household, directly or by referral, including referrals by case
management, mental health treatment, workforce trainings, or ad-
diction treatment;
(iv) The start date and end date of each supportive service pro-
vided directly within the project, by each de-identified house-
hold;
(v) Of those participating in permanent supportive housing,
rapid rehousing, or transitional housing, the number of individ-
uals or households who exited the project during the grant period
and experienced an increase in earned income while participating
in the project;
(vi) Completions and failures of intervention programs, includ-
ing treatment and workforce development, and increases in earned
income; and
(vii) The number of households who exit each project to one of the
following locations or circumstances:
1. Unsheltered homelessness;
2. Owned or rental housing without a subsidy;
3. Rental housing with a subsidy;
4. Referral to treatment;
5. Jail;
6. Hospitalization or death; or
7. Any other location or circumstance; and


(d) Data provided in the report shall be de-identified or randomized
and shall not include any personally identifiable information, includ-
ing but not limited to name, social security number, date of birth, ad-
dress, and contact information.
(3) By February 1 of each year, the association shall submit the report
required by this section to the governor and the legislature and shall post
the report on a publicly available website.
SECTION 2. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2026.